Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-6,115
Information; confidentiality.

All information reported to the department pursuant to section 81-6,114 shall be privileged communications, shall not be discoverable or subject to subpoena, and may not be used or offered or received in evidence in any legal proceeding of any kind or character. Such information shall remain confidential with the department and shall not be disclosed except as provided in sections 81-6,116 and 81-6,117.

Laws 2003, LB 73, § 5.